Florida, session 2026, SB1068.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 54 55 Section 1.âPresent subsections (15) through (20) of section 56 400.506, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (20), 57 (21), (22), (17), (18), and (19), respectively, new subsections 58 (15) and (16) are added to that section, and present subsection 59 (20) of that section is amended, to read: 60 400.506âLicensure of nurse registries; requirements; 61 penalties.â 62 (15)(a)âEach nurse registry shall provide a standardized 63 written disclosure to clients at intake and annually thereafter 64 which must meet all of the following requirements: 65 1.âBe presented in at least 14-point bold type. 66 2.âInclude a signed acknowledgment of receipt by the client 67 or the clientâs representative. 68 3.âContain the following information: 69 a.âA disclaimer as specified in paragraph (16)(c) informing 70 clients that caregivers referred by the nurse registry are 71 independent contractors and not employees of the nurse registry. 72 b.âThe nurse registryâs insurance status, including the 73 type and amount of liability coverage it carries. 74 c.âInstructions for filing complaints, including the 75 contact information for state hotlines, such as the central 76 abuse hotline and the agencyâs consumer hotline, and the 77 applicable professional licensing boards. 78 d.âA clear explanation of the risks associated with patient 79 transport or the operation of lifting equipment, along with 80 documentation of the clientâs consent or refusal to engage in 81 such activities. 82 (b)âThe agency shall adopt rules to implement this 83 subsection, including development of standard disclosure 84 templates and acknowledgment forms. 85 (16)(a)âA nurse registry may not use the terms âhome 86 health,â âhome health care,â or âagencyâ in its business name, 87 advertising, website, or promotional materials. 88 (b)âEach nurse registry must include the term ânurse 89 registryâ in its licensed business name and display its license 90 number prominently in all marketing and advertising, including 91 on digital platforms. 92 (c)âEach nurse registry must display, in a clear and 93 conspicuous manner on its website and in all digital or print 94 marketing materials, the following disclaimer: âAll caregivers 95 referred by this nurse registry are independent contractors, not 96 employees of the nurse registry. By law, the nurse registry does 97 not have any authority to supervise, manage, or train caregivers 98 and does not assume any responsibility for their actions or the 99 services they provide.â 100 (d)âEach nurse registry shall file a current fee schedule 101 with the agency and provide the schedule to clients before 102 initiating services. The fee schedule must clearly disclose all 103 costs and charges in a manner understandable to the general 104 public. 105 (e)âThe agency may impose administrative penalties for 106 failure to comply with this subsection. 107 (19)(20)âRecords required to be filed under this chapter 108 with the nurse registry as a repository of records must be kept 109 in accordance with rules adopted by the agency. The nurse 110 registry has no obligation to review or act upon such records 111 except as specified in subsection (18) (19). 112 Section 2.âPresent subsections (6) and (7) of section 113 400.509, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (10) 114 and (11), respectively, new subsections (6) and (7) and 115 subsections (8) and (9) are added to that section, and present 116 subsections (6) and (7) of that section are amended, to read: 117 400.509âRegistration of particular service providers exempt 118 from licensure; certificate of registration; regulation of 119 registrants.â 120 (6)(a)âRegistered homemakers and companions are subject to 121 an initial inspection and periodic inspections by the agency to 122 determine compliance with applicable laws and rules. 123 (b)âThe agency shall adopt rules establishing the frequency 124 and scope of such inspections, which must occur at least once 125 every 36 months. 126 (c)âThe scope of inspections must include, but need not be 127 limited to, a review of service records, client disclosures, 128 background screening documentation, and compliance with 129 marketing standards specified in subsection (8). 130 (7)(a)âRegistered homemakers and companions shall provide a 131 standardized written disclosure to clients upon initiation of 132 services and annually thereafter which must meet all of the 133 following requirements: 134 1.âBe presented in at least 14-point bold type. 135 2.âInclude a signed acknowledgment of receipt by the client 136 or the clientâs representative. 137 3.âContain the following information: 138 a.âA disclaimer as specified in paragraph (8)(c) informing 139 clients that services provided by a homemaker or a companion are 140 limited to nonmedical, nonâhands-on care. 141 b.âThe homemakerâs or companionâs insurance status, 142 including the type and amount of liability coverage he or she 143 carries. 144 c.âInstructions for filing complaints, including the 145 contact information for state hotlines, such as the central 146 abuse hotline and the agencyâs consumer hotline, and the 147 applicable professional licensing boards. 148 d.âAn explanation of the homemakerâs or companionâs scope 149 and limitations, including the prohibition against personal care 150 or medical services. 151 e.âA disclosure of whether the homemaker or companion is an 152 employee of the referring entity or an independent contractor. 153 (b)âThe agency shall adopt rules to implement this 154 subsection, including development of standard disclosure 155 templates and acknowledgment forms. 156 (8)(a)âRegistered homemakers and companions may not use the 157 terms âhome health,â âhome health care,â ânursing,â ânurse 158 registry,â or âagencyâ in their business names, advertising, 159 website, or promotional materials. 160 (b)âRegistered homemakers and companions must include the 161 phrase âhomemaker servicesâ or âcompanion services,â as 162 applicable, in their licensed business names and display their 163 registration numbers prominently in all marketing and 164 advertising, including on digital platforms. 165 (c)âRegistered homemakers and companions must display, in a 166 clear and conspicuous manner on their websites and in all 167 digital or print marketing materials, the following disclaimer: 168 âThis business provides homemaker or companion services only. 169 Offered services do not include personal care or any hands-on 170 health care. By law, homemakers and companions may not assist 171 with activities requiring a health care license or 172 certification.â 173 (9)(a)âRegistered homemakers and companions shall maintain 174 accurate, chronological service records for each client, 175 including caregiver assignments, incident reports, and 176 acknowledgment of required disclosures. 177 (b)âRegistered homemakers and companions shall document and 178 report to the agency any adverse incidents or complaints, as 179 required by agency rule. 180 (10)(a)âThe agency shall establish by rule procedures for 181 investigating complaints against registered homemakers and 182 companions, including providing for unannounced agency 183 inspections. 184 (b)âThe agency may impose administrative fines or other 185 sanctions for violations of this section or rules adopted 186 pursuant to this section. 187 (c)(6)âIn addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant 188 to this section or part, the agency may assess costs related to 189 an investigation that results in a successful prosecution, 190 excluding costs associated with an attorneyâs time. 191 (11)(7)âThe agency for Health Care Administration shall 192 adopt rules to administer this section and part II of chapter 193 408. 194 Section 3.âSubsection (10) of section 408.803, Florida 195 Statutes, is amended to read: 196 408.803âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 197 (10)ââLow-risk providerâ means a nonresidential provider, 198 including a nurse registry, a home medical equipment provider, 199 or a health care clinic. 200 Section 4.âParagraph (h) of subsection (3) of section 201 817.505, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 202 817.505âPatient brokering prohibited; exceptions; 203 penalties.â 204 (3)âThis section shall not apply to the following payment 205 practices: 206 (h)âCommissions or fees paid to a nurse registry licensed 207 under s. 400.506 for referring persons providing health care 208 services to clients of the nurse registry. 209 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.